hu: Mászóvédelmi eszköz típusa: Aktív ék (rugós feszítőék); Golyós ék; Nitt; Hexa; Passzív ék; Pecker (mikroszög); Sziklamászó szög; Skyhook; Csúszó ék; Tricam; Egyéb
cs: Typ jistícího zařízení: Aktivní vklíněnec (friend); Ball nut; Nýt / borhák; Hexendr; Pasivní vklíněnec; Pecker (mikroskoba); Skoba; Háček (skyhook); Posuvný vklíněnec; Tricam; Jiné
zh-CN: 攀岩保护装置类型: 主动凸轮（弹簧负载凸轮装置）; 球形岩石塞; 挂片; 六角岩石塞; 被动岩石塞; 微型岩钉; 岩钉; 天钩; 滑块岩石塞; 三角岩石塞; 其他
vi: Loại thiết bị bảo hộ leo núi: Cam động (thiết bị cam có lò xo); Ball nut; Bu-lông; Hexentric; Đai ốc tĩnh; Pecker (piton nhỏ); Piton; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Khác
ja: クライミング保護デバイスタイプ: アクティブカム (SLCD); ボールナッツ; ボルト; ヘキセントリック; パッシブナッツ; ペッカー (マイクロピトン); ピトン; スカイフック; スライダーナッツ; トライカム; その他
de: Art der Kletterschutzausrüstung: Aktiver Klemmkeil (SLCD); Ball Nut; Bohrhaken; Hexentric; Passiver Klemmkeil; Pecker (Mikro-Felshaken); Felshaken; Skyhook; Slider Nut; Tricam; Andere
fr: Type de dispositif d'assurage: Coinceur mécanique (coinceur à cames); Coinceur à bille; Goujon; Hexentric; Coinceur passif; Pecker (micro-piton); Piton; Crochet goutte d’eau; Coinceur coulissant; Tricam; Autre
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์ป้องกันในการปีนเขา: แคมแบบแอกทีฟ (อุปกรณ์แคมแบบสปริง); น็อตลูกปืน; โบลต์; เฮกเซนตริก; น็อตพาสซีฟ; เพ็กเกอร์ (ไมโครพิตอน); พิตอน; สกายฮุก; สไลเดอร์นัต; ไตรแคม; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Вид на защитното устройство за катерене: Активен френд (пружинно-ексцентриково устройство); Болнът; Болт; Хексентрик; Пасивна клема; Пекър (микро клин); Клин; Скайхук; Слайдер клема; Трикам; Други
fi: Kiipeilyn turvavälinetyyppi: Aktiivinen varmistuslaite (frendi); Pallokiila; Pultti; Heksa; Passiivinen kiila; Nokkakiila (mikrohaka); Kalliohaka; Kalliokoukku; Liukukiila; Tricam-kiila; Muu
en: Climbing protection device type: Active cam (spring-loaded camming device); Ball nut; Bolt; Hexentric; Passive nut; Pecker (micro piton); Piton; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Other
ru: Тип страховочного устройства для скалолазания: Френд (пружинно-кулачковое устройство); Шариковая закладка (Ball nut); Анкерный болт; Гекса; Стоппер (пассивная закладка); Клюв (микроякорь); Скалистый крюк; Скайхук; Слайдер (закладка); Трайкам; Другое
pl: Typ ochraniacza wspinaczkowego: Kość mechaniczna (friend); Kość kulkowa; Spit; Heks; Kość pasywna; Hak typu pecker (mikrohak); Hak; Skyhook; Slider; Tricam; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta uređaja za zaštitu tijekom penjanja: Aktivni zaglavak (frend); Kuglasti zaglavak (ball nut); Klin (bolt); Heks (hexentric); Pasivni zaglavak (čok); Pecker (mikro klin); Klin; Skyhook; Klizni zaglavak; Tricam; Ostalo
zh-TW: 攀岩保護裝置類型: 主動式岩械 (彈簧負載岩械); 球型岩械 (Ball nut); 螺栓; 六角岩楔; 被動式岩楔; 啄型岩釘 (微型岩釘); 岩釘; 天鉤; 滑動式岩楔; 三仙岩楔 (Tricam); 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de dispositivo de segurança para escalada: Cam ativo (dispositivo de came com mola); Ball nut; Perno; Excêntrico hexagonal; Entalador passivo; Pecker (micropitão); Pitão; Skyhook; Entalador deslizante; Tricam; Outro
tr: Tırmanış koruma ekipmanı tipi: Aktif yaylı takoz (SLCD); Bilyeli takoz; Bolt; Hegzagonal takoz; Pasif takoz; Pecker (mikro sikke); Sikke; Skyhook; Sürgülü takoz; Tricam; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta varovalne opreme za plezanje: Aktivno varovalo (metulj); Kroglična zagozda; Svedrovec; Heksagon; Pasivna zagozda; Kljunček (mikro klin); Klin; Skyhook kavelj; Drsna zagozda; Tricam zagozda; Drugo
sv: Typ av enhet för klättringsskydd: Aktiv kamkil (fjäderbelastad); Ball nut; Bult; Hexentric; Passiv kil; Pecker (mikrobult); Pitong; Skyhook; Slider-kil; Tricam; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de dispositivo de proteção para escalada: Came ativo (dispositivo de came com mola); Ball nut; Chapeleta; Hexêntrico; Nut passivo; Pecker (micro piton); Piton; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Outros
es: Tipo de dispositivo de protección para escalada: Leva activa (dispositivo de levas con resorte); Empotrador de bola; Perno; Hexcéntrico; Nuez pasiva; Pecker (micropitón); Pitón; Skyhook; Fisurero deslizante; Tricam; Otro
da: Klatrebeskyttelsesanordningens type: Aktiv kile (fjederbelastet camming-enhed); Ball nut; Bolt; Hexentric; Passiv kile; Pecker (mikro-piton); Piton; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Andet
el: Τύπος προστατευτικής διάταξης αναρρίχησης: Ενεργό cam (spring-loaded camming device); Ball nut; Bolt (αγκύριο); Hexentric; Παθητικό nut; Pecker (micro piton); Piton; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ horolezeckej ochrannej pomôcky: Aktívny vačkový prostriedok (friend); Guľový vklínenec; Nit; Hexander; Pasívny vklínenec; Pecker (mikroskoba); Skoba; Háčik (skyhook); Posuvný vklínenec; Tricam; Iné
ko: 클라이밍 보호 장비 유형: 액티브 캠(스프링 장착 캠 장치); 볼 너트; 볼트; 헥센트릭; 패시브 너트; 페커(마이크로 피톤); 피톤; 스카이훅; 슬라이더 너트; 트라이캠; 기타
it: Tipo di dispositivo di protezione da arrampicata: A camma attiva (friend); Ball nut; Spit; Excentric; Nut passivo; Pecker (microchiodo); Chiodo; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Altro
nb: Type klatrebeskyttelsesenhet: Aktiv kile (kamkile); Kulekile; Bolt; Hex; Passiv kile; Pecker (mikrobolt); Piton; Skyhook; Slider-kile; Tricam; Annet
lt-LT: Laipiojimo saugos įtaiso tipas: Aktyvusis spyruoklinis kaištis; Rutulinis kaištis; Inkarinis varžtas; Šešiabriaunis kaištis; Pasyvusis kaištis; Mikrokablys („Pecker“); Uolos kablys; Kablys „Skyhook“; Slankiojantis kaištis; „Tricam“ kaištis; Kita
nl: Type beveiligingsmiddel voor klimmen: Actieve cam (spring-loaded camming device); Ball nut; Boorhaak; Hexentric; Passieve nut; Pecker (micro-piton); Mepthaak; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Overig
ro-RO: Tipul dispozitivului de protecție pentru escaladă: Dispozitiv activ cu came (friend); Ball nut; Spit (bolt); Hexcentric; Nucă pasivă (nut); Pecker (micro-piton); Piton; Skyhook; Slider nut; Tricam; Altele